North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1. In General.
§ 163-278.13B.
Limitation on fund-raising during legislative session.

Definitions. — For purposes of this section:

“Limited contributor” means a lobbyist registered under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, that lobbyist’s agent, that lobbyist’s principal as defined in G.S. 120C-100(21) or a political committee that employs or contracts with or whose parent entity
employs or contracts with a lobbyist registered under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes.

“Limited contributee” means a member of or candidate for the Council of State, a member of or candidate for the General Assembly, an affiliated party committee, or a Council of State affiliated party committee.

The General Assembly is in “regular session” from the date set by law or resolution that the General Assembly convenes until the General Assembly either adjourns sine die or recesses or adjourns for more than 10 days.

A contribution is “made” during regular session if the check or other instrument is dated during the session, or if the check or other instrument is delivered to the limited contributee during session, or if the limited contributor pledges during the
session to deliver the check or other instrument at a later time.

A contribution is “accepted” during regular session if the check or other instrument is dated during the session, or if the limited contributee receives the check or other instrument during session and does not return it within 10 days, or agrees during
session to receive the check or other instrument at a later time.

Prohibited Solicitations. — While the General Assembly is in regular session, no limited contributee or the real or purported agent of a limited contributee shall:

Solicit a contribution from a limited contributor to be made to that limited contributee or to be made to any other candidate, officeholder, or political committee; or

Solicit a third party, requesting or directing that the third party directly or indirectly solicit a contribution from a limited contributor or relay to the limited contributor the limited contributee’s solicitation of a contribution.It shall not be deemed
a violation of this section for a limited contributee to serve on a board or committee of an organization that makes a solicitation of a limited contributor as long as that limited contributee does not directly participate
in the solicitation and that limited contributee does not directly benefit from the solicitation.

Prohibited Contributions. — While the General Assembly is in regular session:

No limited contributor shall make or offer to make a contribution to a limited contributee.

No limited contributor shall make a contribution to any candidate, officeholder, or political committee, directing or requesting that the contribution be made in turn to a limited contributee.

No limited contributor shall transfer any amount of money or anything of value to any entity, directing or requesting that the entity use what was transferred to contribute to a limited contributee.

No limited contributee or the real or purported agent of a limited contributee prohibited from solicitation by subsection (b) of this section shall accept a contribution from a limited contributor.

No limited contributor shall solicit a contribution from any individual or political committee on behalf of a limited contributee. This subdivision does not apply to a limited contributor soliciting a contribution on behalf of a political party executive
committee or an affiliated party committee if the solicitation is solely for a separate segregated fund kept by the political party or affiliated party committee limited to use for activities that are not candidate-specific,
including generic voter registration and get-out-the-vote efforts, pollings, mailings, and other general activities and advertising that do not refer to a specific individual candidate.

Exception. — The provisions of this section do not apply with regard to a limited contributee during the three weeks prior to the day of a second primary if that limited contributee is a candidate who will be on the ballot in that second primary.

Prosecution. — A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.
1997-515, s. 9(b); 1999-31, s. 5(d); 1999-453, s. 6(a); 2000-136, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 21; 2015-258, s. 3(i), (s); 2015-264, s. 81(e); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.13C.
Campaign contributions prohibition.

No lobbyist may make a contribution as defined in

G.S. 163-278.6

to a candidate or candidate campaign committee as defined in

G.S. 163-278.38

Z when that candidate meets any of the following criteria:

Is a legislator as defined in

G.S. 120C-100

.

Is a public servant as defined in G.S. 138A-3(30)a and

G.S. 120C-104

.

No lobbyist may do any of the following with respect to a candidate or candidate campaign committee described in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section:

Collect a contribution or multiple contributions from one or more contributors intended for that candidate or candidate campaign committee.

Take possession of a contribution or multiple contributions intended for that candidate or candidate campaign committee.

Transfer or deliver a collected contribution or multiple contributions to the intended candidate or candidate campaign committee.

This section shall not apply to a lobbyist, who has filed a notice of candidacy for office under

G.S. 163-106

or Article 11 of this Chapter or has been nominated under

G.S. 163-114

or

G.S. 163-98

, making a contribution to that lobbyist’s candidate campaign committee.

For purposes of this section, the term “lobbyist” shall mean an individual registered as a lobbyist under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes.

History.
2006-201, s. 18; 2007-347, s. 5(a), (b); 2008-213, s. 86; 2013-381, s. 47.1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.14.
No contributions in names of others; no anonymous contributions; contributions in excess of fifty dollars; no contribution without specific designation of contributor.

No individual, political committee, or other entity shall make any contribution anonymously or in the name of another. No candidate, political committee, referendum committee, political party, affiliated party committee, or treasurer shall knowingly accept
any contribution made by any individual or person in the name of another individual or person or made anonymously. If a candidate, political committee, referendum committee, political party, affiliated party committee, or treasurer
receives anonymous contributions or contributions determined to have been made in the name of another, he shall pay the money over to the Board, by check, and all such moneys received by the Board shall be deposited in the Civil
Penalty and Forfeiture Fund of the State of North Carolina. This subsection shall not apply to any contribution by an individual with the lawful authority to act on behalf of another individual, whether through power of attorney,
trustee, or other lawful authority.

No entity shall make, and no candidate, committee or treasurer shall accept, any monetary contribution in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) unless such contribution is in the form of a check, draft, money order, credit card charge, debit, or other noncash
method that can be subject to written verification. No contribution in the form of check, draft, money order, credit card charge, debits, or other noncash method may be made or accepted unless it contains a specific designation
of the intended contributee chosen by the contributor. The State Board may prescribe guidelines as to the reporting and verification of any method of contribution payment allowed under this Article. For contributions by money order,
the State Board of Elections shall prescribe methods to ensure an audit trail for every contribution so that the identity of the contributor can be determined. For a contribution made by credit card, the credit card account number
of a contributor is not a public record.

No political committee or referendum committee shall make any contribution unless in doing so it reports to the recipient the contributor’s name as required in G.S. 163-278.7(b)(1).

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 1073, s. 19; 1987, c. 113, s. 2; 1999-453, s. 4(a); 2001-319, s. 10(a); 2002-159, s. 55(k); 2004-125, s. 5(b); 2005-430, s. 1; 2006-195, ss. 1, 5.2; 2007-484, s. 23; 2010-169, s. 6(b); 2015-258,
s. 3(j); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.14A.
Evidence that communications are “to support or oppose the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates.”

The following shall be means of proving that an individual or other entity acted “to support or oppose the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates”: presenting evidence of financial sponsorship of communications to the general
public that use phrases such as “vote for”, “reelect”, “support”, “cast your ballot for”, “(name of candidate) for (name of office)”, “(name of candidate) in (year)”, “vote against”, “defeat”, “reject”, “vote pro-(policy position)”
or “vote anti-(policy position)” accompanied by a list of candidates clearly labeled “pro-(policy position)” or “anti-(policy position)”, or communications of campaign words or slogans, such as posters, bumper stickers, advertisements,
etc., which say “(name of candidate)’s the One”, “(name of candidate) ’98”, “(name of candidate)!”, or the names of two candidates joined by a hyphen or slash.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a communication shall not be subject to regulation as a contribution or expenditure under this Article if it:

Appears in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, or magazine, unless those facilities are owned or controlled by any political party, affiliated party committee, or political
committee;

Is distributed by a corporation solely to its stockholders and employees; or

Is distributed by any organization, association, or labor union solely to its members or to subscribers or recipients of its regular publications, or is made available to individuals in response to their request, including through the Internet.

History.
1999-453, s. 3(a); 2008-150, s. 6(b); 2015-258, s. 3(k); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.15.
No acceptance of contributions made by corporations, foreign and domestic, or other prohibited sources.

No candidate, political committee, political party, affiliated party committee, or treasurer shall accept any contribution made by any corporation, foreign or domestic, regardless of whether such corporation does business in the State of North Carolina,
or made by any business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company. This section does not apply with regard to entities permitted to make contributions by G.S. 163-278.19(h).

A candidate or political committee may accept a contribution knowing that the contribution is the proceeds of a loan made in the ordinary course of business by a financial institution if all of the following conditions are met:

The full amount of the loan is secured by collateral placed, or by guaranties given, by one or more individuals or entities who are not prohibited by this Article from making contributions to the candidate or political committee. The value of the collateral
posted by each individual or entity, or the amount of each guaranty, may not exceed the contribution limitations applicable under this Article to each individual or entity. The value of collateral posted may exceed the
contribution limitations applicable under this Article in cases where the amount of the loan secured by that collateral does not exceed the contribution limitations applicable to the individual or entity.

During the time that any loan remains outstanding and unpaid, then the value of any collateral posted, or the amount of each guaranty, for that loan shall be considered to be a contribution by the individual or entity securing the loan. If the loan, or
any portion of the loan, is repaid to the financial institution by the candidate or political committee to whom the loan was made during the contribution limitation period for the same “election” as defined in G.S. 163-278.13(e)
in which the loan was made, the individual or entity securing the loan shall be eligible to further contribute to that candidate or political committee up to the amount of the repayment. If multiple individuals or entities
secured the loan that is repaid to the financial institution by the candidate or political committee, then the amount repaid shall be prorated amongst the multiple individuals or entities.

If the loan is to the candidate or political committee, only the candidate, the candidate’s spouse, or the political committee to whom the loan was made may repay the loan.

The State Board of Elections shall develop forms for reporting the proceeds of loans in a full and accurate manner.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1999-31, s. 5(e); 2006-195, s. 6; 2006-262, s. 4.1(c); 2015-258, s. 3(l); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.16.
Regulations regarding timing of contributions and expenditures.

Except as provided in G.S. 163-278.6(74) and

G.S. 163-278.12

, no contribution may be received or expenditure made by or on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee:

Until the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee appoints a treasurer and certifies the name and address of the treasurer to the Board; and

Unless the contribution is received or the expenditure made by or through the treasurer of the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 565, s. 2; 1979, c. 500, s. 4; c. 1073, ss. 19, 20; 1987, c. 652; 1997-515, s. 13.1(a); 1999-31, ss. 1(d), 4(b); 1999-453, s. 2(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.16A.
Restriction on use of State funds by declared candidate for Council of State for advertising or public service announcements using their names, pictures, or voices.

After December 31 prior to a general election in which a Council of State office will be on the ballot, no declared candidate for that Council of State office shall use or permit the use of State funds for any advertisement or public service announcement
in a newspaper, on radio, or on television that contains that declared candidate’s name, picture, or voice, except in case of State or national emergency and only if the announcement is reasonably necessary to that candidate’s official
function. For purposes of this section, “declared candidate” means someone who has publicly announced an intention to run.

History.
1997-515, s. 13(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.16B.
Use of contributions for certain purposes.

A candidate or candidate campaign committee may use contributions only for the following purposes:

Expenditures resulting from the campaign for public office by the candidate or candidate’s campaign committee.

Expenditures resulting from holding public office.

Donations to an organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 170(c)), provided that the candidate or the candidate’s spouse, children, parents, brothers, or sisters are not employed by the organization.

Contributions to a national, State, or district or county committee of a political party or a caucus of the political party or an affiliated party committee.

Contributions to another candidate or candidate’s campaign committee.

To return all or a portion of a contribution to the contributor.

Payment of any penalties against the candidate or candidate’s campaign committee for violation of this Article imposed by a board of elections or a court of competent jurisdiction.

Payment to the Escheat Fund established by Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

Legal expense donation not in excess of four thousand dollars ($4,000) per calendar year to a legal expense fund established pursuant to Article 22M of this Chapter.

As used in this section, the term “candidate campaign committee” means the same as in

G.S. 163-278.38

Z(3).

Contributions made to a candidate or candidate campaign committee do not become a part of the personal estate of the individual candidate. The candidate may file with the board a written designation of those funds that directs to which of the permitted
uses in subsection (a) of this section those funds shall be paid in the event of the death or incapacity of the candidate. If the candidate fails to file the written designation before death, the personal representative of the
estate may file the written designation within 90 days of the date of death, and may only direct those funds to donations under subdivision (a)(3) of this section. After the payment of permitted outstanding debts of the account,
the candidate’s filed written designation shall control. If the candidate files no such written designation, the funds after payment of permitted outstanding debts shall be distributed in accordance with subdivision (a)(8) of this
section.

History.
2006-161, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 30; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2008-213, s. 87; 2009-534, s. 2(h); 2010-100, s. 1; 2015-258, s. 3(m); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-100, s. 2, which amended subsection (c), provides in part: “For any candidate campaign committee that is in active status with the State Board of Elections as of the date this act becomes law [July 20, 2010], the personal representative
of the estate may file the written designation within 90 days of the day this act receives preclearance under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 20, 2010.

§ 163-278.17.
Statements of media outlets
regarding political advertising.

Each media outlet shall require written authority for each expenditure from each candidate, treasurer or individual making or authorizing an expenditure. A candidate may authorize advertisement paid for by a treasurer appointed by the candidate. All written
authorizations of expenditures signed by a candidate, treasurer or individual shall be deemed public records and copies of those written authorizations shall be available for inspection during normal business hours at the office(s)
of the media outlet making the publication or broadcast nearest to the place(s) of publication or broadcast.

Each media outlet shall require written authority for each independent expenditure or electioneering communication from each individual, person, or entity making or authorizing an independent expenditure or electioneering communication. All written authorizations
of independent expenditures or electioneering communications shall be deemed public records, and copies of those written authorizations shall be available for inspection during normal business hours at the office(s) of the media
outlet making the publication or broadcast nearest to the place(s) of publication or broadcast. The written authorization shall include all of the following:

The name and address of the individual, person, or entity making the independent expenditure or electioneering communication.

The information required by

G.S. 163-278.39(a)

, provided however that the provisions of

G.S. 163-278.39(a)

(7) and (a)(8) shall not apply to radio or television advertising.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 565, s. 3; 1979, c. 500, ss. 5, 6; c. 1073, s. 9; 1985, c. 183, ss. 1, 2; 2010-170, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.18.
Normal commercial charges for political advertising.

No media and no supplier of materials or services shall charge or require a candidate, treasurer, political party, affiliated party committee, or individual to pay a charge for advertising, materials, space, or services purchased for or in support of
or in opposition to any candidate, political committee, or political party that is higher than the normal charge it requires other customers to pay for comparable advertising, materials, space, or services purchased for other purposes.

A newspaper, magazine, or other advertising medium shall not charge any candidate, treasurer, political committee, political party, or individual for any advertising for or in support of or in opposition to any candidate, political committee or political
party at a rate higher than the comparable rate charged to other persons for advertising of comparable frequency and volume; and every candidate, treasurer, political party or individual, with respect to political advertising,
shall be entitled to the same discounts afforded by the advertising medium to other advertisers under comparable conditions and circumstances.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1977, c. 856; 2015-258, s. 3(n); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.19.
Violations by corporations, business entities, labor unions, professional associations and insurance companies.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), (f), (g), (h), and (i) of this section it shall be unlawful for any corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company directly or indirectly do any of the following:

To make any contribution to a candidate or political committee.

To pay or use or offer, consent or agree to pay or use any of its money or property for any contribution to a candidate or political committee.

To compensate, reimburse, or indemnify any person or individual for money or property so used or for any contribution or expenditure so made.

It shall also be unlawful for any officer, director, stockholder, attorney, agent or member of any corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company to aid, abet, advise or consent to any such contribution, or for
any person or individual to solicit or knowingly receive any such contribution. Supporting or opposing the election of clearly identified candidates includes supporting or opposing the candidates of a clearly identified
political party. Any officer, director, stockholder, attorney, agent or member of any corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company aiding or abetting in any contribution made
in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, and shall in addition be liable to such corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company for the amount
of such contribution and the same may be recovered of him upon suit by any stockholder or member thereof.

A transfer of funds shall be deemed to have been a contribution made indirectly if it is made to any committee, affiliated party committee, or political party account, whether inside or outside this State, with the intent or purpose of being exchanged
in whole or in part for any other funds to be contributed or expended in an election for North Carolina office or to offset any other funds contributed or expended in an election for North Carolina office.

Proceeds of loans made in the ordinary course of business by financial institutions may be used for contributions made in compliance with this Subchapter. Financial institutions may also grant revolving credit to political committees and referendum committees
in the ordinary course of business.

It shall, however, be lawful for any corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company to communicate with its employees, stockholders or members and their families on any subject; to conduct nonpartisan registration
and get-out-the-vote campaigns aimed at their employees, stockholders, or members and their families; or for officials and employees of any corporation, insurance company or business entity or the officials and members of any labor
union or professional association to establish, administer, contribute to, and to receive and solicit contributions to a separate segregated fund to be utilized for political purposes, and those individuals shall be deemed to become
and be a political committee as that term is defined in G.S. 163-278.6(74) or a referendum committee as defined in G.S. 163-278.6(84); provided, however, that it shall be unlawful for any such fund to make a contribution or expenditure
by utilizing contributions secured by physical force, job discrimination, financial reprisals or the threat of force, job discrimination or financial reprisals, or by dues, fees, or other moneys required as a condition of membership
or employment or as a requirement with respect to any terms or conditions of employment, including, without limitation, hiring, firing, transferring, promoting, demoting, or granting seniority or employment-related benefits of
any kind, or by moneys obtained in any commercial transaction whatsoever.

A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, the acceptance of any contribution, reimbursement, or indemnification under subsection (a) shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor.

Whenever a candidate or treasurer is an officer, director, stockholder, attorney, agent, or employee of any corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company, and by virtue of his position therewith uses office space
and communication facilities of the corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association or insurance company in the normal and usual scope of his employment, the fact that the candidate or treasurer receives telephone
calls, mail, or visits in such office which relates to activities prohibited by this Article shall not be considered a violation under this section.

Notwithstanding the prohibitions specified in this Article and Article 22 of this Chapter, a political committee organized under provisions of this Article shall be entitled to receive and the corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association,
or insurance company designated on the committee’s organizational report as the parent entity of the employees or members who organized the committee is authorized to give reasonable administrative support that shall include record
keeping, computer services, billings, mailings to members of the committee, membership development, fund-raising activities, office supplies, office space, and such other support as is reasonably necessary for the administration
of the committee.The approximate cost of any reasonable administrative support shall be submitted to the committee, in writing, and the committee shall include that cost on the report required by G.S. 163-278.9(a)(4). Also included
in the report shall be the approximate allocable portion of the compensation of any officer or employee of the corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company who has devoted more than
thirty-five percent (35%) of his time during normal business hours of the corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company during the period covered by the required report. The approximate
cost submitted by the parent corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company shall be entered on the committee’s report as the final entry on its list of “contributions” and a copy of the
written approximate cost received by it shall be attached.The reasonable administrative support given by a corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company shall be designated on the books
of the corporation, business entity, labor union, professional association, or insurance company as such and may not be treated by it as a business deduction for State income tax purposes.

This section does not prohibit a contribution by an [a] person or entity that:

Has as an express purpose promoting social, educational, or political ideas and not to generate business income;

Does not have shareholders or other persons which have an economic interest in its assets and earnings; and

Was not established by a business corporation, by an insurance company, by a business entity, including, but not limited to, those chartered under Chapter 55, Chapter 55A, Chapter 55B, or Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, by a professional association,
or by a labor union and does not receive substantial revenue from such entities. Substantial revenue is rebuttably presumed to be more than ten percent (10%) of total revenues in a calendar year.

If a political committee has as its only purpose accepting contributions and making expenditures to influence elections, and that political committee incorporates as a nonprofit corporation to shield its participants from liability created outside this
Subchapter, that political committee is not considered to be a corporation for purposes of this section. Incorporation of a political committee does not relieve any individual, person, or other entity of any liability, duty, or
obligation created pursuant to any provision of this Subchapter. To obtain the benefits of this subsection, an incorporating political committee must state exactly the following language as the only purpose for which the corporation
can be organized: “to accept contributions and make expenditures to influence elections as a political committee pursuant to G.S. 163-278.6(74) only.” No political committee shall do business as a political committee after incorporation
unless it has been certified by the State Board as being in compliance with this subsection.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 565, s. 6; 1979, c. 517, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 354; 1987, c. 113, s. 3; c. 565, s. 16; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1115, 1116; c. 553, s. 69; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-31, ss. 4(d), 5(a), 6(b);
2001-487, s. 97(a); 2002-159, s. 57.3(a), (b); 2006-195, s. 3; 2006-262, ss. 4.1(a), (b), 4.3; 2010-170, s. 5; 2015-258, s. 3(o); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.19A.
Contributions allowed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, it is lawful for any person as defined in G.S. 163-278.6(72) to contribute to a referendum committee.

History.
1979, c. 1073, s. 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.19B.
Political party headquarters building funds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 163-278.19

, a person prohibited by that section from making a contribution may donate to political parties and affiliated party committees and political parties and affiliated party committees may accept from such a person money
and other things of value donated to a political party headquarters building fund. Donations to the political party headquarters building fund shall be subject to all the following rules:

The donations solicited and accepted are designated to the political party headquarters building fund.

Potential donors to that fund are advised that all donations will be exclusively for the political party headquarters building fund.

The political party or affiliated party committee establishes a separate segregated bank account into which shall be deposited only donations for the political party headquarters building fund from persons prohibited by

G.S. 163-278.19

from making contributions.

The donations deposited in the separate segregated bank account for the political party headquarters building fund will be spent only to purchase a principal headquarters building, to construct a principal headquarters building, to renovate a principal
headquarters building, to pay a mortgage on a principal headquarters building, to repay donors if a principal headquarters building is not purchased, constructed, or renovated, or to pay building rent or monthly or bimonthly utility
expenses incurred to operate the principal headquarters building. Donations deposited into that account shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in the preceding sentence, and specifically shall not be used for headquarters
equipment other than fixtures, personnel compensation, or travel or fundraising expenses or requirements of any kind. Notwithstanding the above, personnel compensation and in-kind benefits may be paid to no more than three personnel
whose functions are primarily administrative in nature, such as providing accounting, payroll, or campaign finance reporting services, for the party and whose job functions require no more than ten percent (10%) of work time to
be spent on political advocacy each calendar year.

The political party executive committee or affiliated party committee shall report donations to and spending by a political party headquarters building fund on every report required to be made by

G.S. 163-278.9

. If a committee is excused from making general campaign finance reports under

G.S. 163-278.10

A, that committee shall nonetheless report donations in any amount to and spending in any amount by the political party headquarters building fund at the times required for reports in

G.S. 163-278.9

. If all the criteria set forth in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this section are complied with, then donations to and spending by a political party headquarters building fund do not constitute contributions or
expenditures as defined in

G.S. 163-278.6

. If those criteria are complied with, then donations may be made to a political party headquarters building fund.

History.
1999-426, s. 9(a); 2013-381, s. 43.1; 2015-258, s. 3(p); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-195, s. 2, effective January 1, 2007, and applicable to all contributions made and accepted on and after that date.

§ 163-278.21.
Promulgation of policy and administration through State Board of Elections.

The State Board of Elections shall have responsibility, adequate staff, equipment and facilities, for promulgating all regulations necessary for the enforcement and administration of this Article and to prevent the circumvention of the provisions of this
Article. The State Board of Elections shall empower the Executive Director with the responsibility for the administrative operations required to administer this Article and may delegate or assign to him such other duties from time
to time by regulations or orders of the State Board of Elections.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 798, s. 7; 1999-453, s. 5(c); 2001-319, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).